New Mexico, session 2026, SB157.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. A new section of the Public Utility Act is enacted to read: "[NEW MATERIAL] PORTABLE SOLAR GENERATION DEVICES.-- A. As used in this section, "portable solar generation device" means a movable photovoltaic generation device that: (1) has a maximum power output of not more than one thousand nine hundred twenty watts; (2) is designed to connect directly to the electrical system of a building using a one hundred twenty volt alternating current standard electrical outlet; (3) is used to offset the on-site electricity consumption of the owner or operator of the portable solar generation device; (4) includes a device or feature that prevents the device from energizing a building's electrical system or backfeeding into a utility's system during a power outage; (5) meets the standards of the New Mexico electrical code adopted by the construction industries commission; and (6) is certified by a nationally recognized testing laboratory. B. An owner or operator of a portable solar generation device is exempt from interconnection and net-metering requirements, regardless of whether the owner or operator is served by a public utility. Any electricity generated by the portable solar generation device that flows onto the utility's system shall be considered non-compensated energy. C. A public utility shall not require an owner or operator of a portable solar generation device to: (1) obtain the public utility's approval before installing or using a portable solar generation device; (2) provide notification or registration for the use of a portable solar generation device; (3) pay a fee or charge related to the portable solar generation device or the electricity the portable solar generation device feeds into a building's electrical system; or (4) install additional controls or equipment beyond what is integrated into the portable solar generation device. D. Pursuant to the provisions of Section 3-18-32 NMSA 1978, a covenant, restriction or condition contained in an instrument affecting the transfer, sale or use, or an interest in real property that effectively prohibits the installation or use, of a portable solar generation device is void and unenforceable." - 3 -